Utah statutes.
78B-1-118.   Jurors and witnesses -- Judicial Council rules governing fee payment.

The Judicial Council shall adopt rules governing the method of payment of fees, mileage, and other expenses of jurors and witnesses, authorization for payment, record of payment, and the audit of payment records.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

